Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB25.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 158.175 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As a continuation of the policy of teaching our country's history and as an
affirmation of the freedom of religion in this country, the board of education of a
local school district may authorize the recitation of the traditional Lord's prayer and
the pledge of allegiance to the flag in public elementary schools. Pupil participation
in the recitation of the prayer and pledge of allegiance shall be voluntary. Pupils
shall be reminded that this Lord's prayer is the prayer our pilgrim fathers recited
when they came to this country in their search for freedom. Pupils shall be informed
that these exercises are not meant to influence an individual's personal religious
beliefs in any manner. The exercises shall be conducted so that pupils shall learn of
our great freedoms, including the freedom of religion symbolized by the recitation
of the Lord's prayer.
(2) The board of education of each school district shall establish a policy and develop
procedures whereby the pupils in each elementary and secondary school may
participate in the pledge of allegiance to the flag of the United States at the
commencement of each school day.
(3) The Kentucky Board of Education shall develop a program of instruction relating to
the flag of the United States of America, including instruction in etiquette, the
correct use and display of the flag, and other patriotic exercises as may be related.
This program of instruction shall be provided to each public school for use in its
course of instruction. The program of instruction, at a minimum, shall include the
provisions of 4 U.S.C. secs. 1 to 3 and 4 U.S.C. secs. 5 to 9.
(4) The board of education of each local school district may purchase or otherwise
acquire and provide for display in each classroom copies of the Declaration of
Independence, the Gettysburg Address, and other documents the local board deems
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 12/10/2024 8:21 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 819
significant to the history of Kentucky and the United States.
(5) (a) The board of education of each local school district shall establish a policy
and develop procedures whereby, at the commencement of the first class of
each day in all public schools, there shall be[, the teacher in charge of the
room may announce that] a moment of silence or reflection of at least one (1)
minute, but not to exceed two (2)[one (1)] minutes,[minute] in duration[ shall
be observed].
(b) The policy required in paragraph (a) of this subsection shall ensure that all
pupils remain seated and silent and make no distracting display so that each
pupil may, in the exercise of his or her individual choice, meditate, pray, or
engage in any other silent activity which does not interfere with, distract
from, or impede other pupils' exercise of individual choice. The policy shall
prohibit district personnel from providing instruction to any student
regarding the nature of any reflection that a student may engage in during
the moment of silence or reflection. The policy shall require notification be
sent to parents or guardians providing information on the policy and
encouraging parents and guardians to provide guidance to their pupils
regarding the moment of silence or reflection.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 12/10/2024 8:21 AM Jacketed